Massachusetts, session 194th, S2464.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection c. of section 1 of chapter 322 of the acts of 2018 is hereby 
amended by adding the following sentence:- The Citizens Commission shall continue to exist 
and perform the responsibilities required in this section until December 31, 2028. 
SECTION 2. Section 3 of said chapter 322 is hereby amended by adding the following 
subsection:- 
j) If a vacancy occurs on the Citizens Commission, the chair or co-chairs of the Citizens 
Commission shall give notice of such vacancy to the appropriate appointing authority and the 
appointing authority shall, not more than 30 days after receiving notice of the vacancy, appoint: 
(i) a person who previously duly applied to serve on the Citizens Commission pursuant to the 
process described in this act; or (ii) a person who files an application pursuant to this act; 
provided, however, that notice of such vacancy shall be posted by the appointing authority not 

of 2 12 later than 7 days after the appointing authority receives notice of the vacancy; provided further, 
that the appointee’s application shall be publicly posted prior to the appointment.”.